Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-1,118
Cost-benefit analysis and review
of Laws 1993, LB 757; reports.

On January 1, 1997, the Governor
shall direct the Director of Insurance and the Commissioner of Labor to conduct
and complete a cost-benefit analysis and a review of the effectiveness of
the changes made by Laws 1993, LB 757, to control or reduce the cost of workers'
compensation premiums. Information for the study may be elicited from interested
persons and from the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court. The director and
the commissioner shall submit a report, which may include recommendations
for further legislation, to the chairperson of the Business and Labor Committee
of the Legislature, the Clerk of the Legislature, and the Governor by October
1, 1997. The Business and Labor Committee of the Legislature shall hold a
public hearing on the study and shall submit a report to the Legislature by
December 1, 1997. The Governor or the Legislature, by resolution, may require
a similar study in 1999 and every two years thereafter. Any report submitted to the committee and the Clerk of
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1993, LB 757, § 40;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 60.